Massachusetts, session 194th, S1343.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 150E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “executive”, in line 10, the 
following:- , legislative. 
SECTION 2. Said section 1 of said chapter 150E, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after the definition of “Legislative body” the following paragraphs:- 
“Legislative employees”, all employees of the general court, including, but not limited to, 
legislative personal employees, employees of committees, caucuses, legislative information 
services, the house and senate business offices, the engrossing division, the house and senate 
clerk’s offices, the house and senate counsel’s offices and the house and senate human resource 
offices.  

of 3 11  “Legislative personal employees”, general court employees whom the house speaker or 
senate president has approved for employment in the office of a particular senator or 
representative at the request of said senator or representative. 
SECTION 3. Section 3 of said chapter 150E, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after the third paragraph the following paragraphs:- 
Appropriate bargaining units in the senate may include all legislative employees; 
provided, however, that: (1) in the case of legislative personal employees, legislative employees 
within the senate president’s office, the senate minority leader’s office, the office of the chair of 
the senate ways and means committee, the senate clerk’s office, or senate counsel’s office may 
be managerial or confidential employees that are excluded from the bargaining unit if said 
employees are managerial or confidential employees as defined in section 1; and (2) in the case 
of all other legislative employees, said employees may be excluded from a bargaining unit if said 
employees are managerial or confidential employees as defined in section 1. 
Appropriate bargaining units in the house may include all legislative employees; 
provided, however, that: (1) in the case of legislative personal employees, legislative employees 
within the house speaker’s office, the house minority leader’s office, the office of the chair of the 
house ways and means committee, the house clerk’s office, or house counsel’s office may be 
managerial or confidential employees that are excluded from the bargaining unit if said 
employees are managerial or confidential employees as defined in section 1; and (2) in the case 
of all other legislative employees, said employees may be excluded from a bargaining unit if said 
employees are managerial or confidential employees as defined in section 1. 

of 3 32  SECTION 4. Section 23 of chapter 268A of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking out the words “; and (iv) establishing additional exclusions for other situations that do 
not present a genuine risk of a conflict or the appearance of a conflict of interest” and inserting in 
place thereof the following words:- 
; (iv) establishing additional exclusions for other situations that do not present a genuine 
risk of a conflict or the appearance of a conflict of interest; and (v) establishing specific 
exemptions, exclusions and procedures for curing particular perceptions of a conflict of interest 
as they may apply to exclusive representatives under chapter 150E.